Wyoming, session 2026, HB0176.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and
subject to the rules required pursuant to subsection (b) of
this section, each student that successfully completes a
competency-based equivalency examination, as authorized by
W.S. 21-2-304(a)(iii), shall be included within the average
daily membership (ADM) of the school district, solely for
HB0176

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0504
the course completed by examination, through the remainder
of the semester in which the examination was completed.

(b) The state superintendent shall promulgate rules,
in accordance with W.S. 21-2-202(e), necessary for the
operation of the education resource block grant model, as
defined by W.S. 21-13-101(a)(xiv), in accordance with
subsection (a) of this section.

Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0176